Missouri, session 2026, HB3047.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 441, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 441.927, to read as follows:
441.927. 1. As used in this section, "veteran" means any person who is a
resident of this state who has been separated under honorable conditions from the
Armed Forces of the United States who served on active duty during peacetime or
wartime for at least six consecutive months, unless released early as a result of a service-
connected disability or a reduction in force at the convenience of the government, or any
member of a reserve or National Guard component who has satisfactorily completed at
least six years of service or who was called or ordered to active duty by the President
and participated in any campaign or expedition for which a campaign badge or service
medal has been authorized.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law, no landlord shall evict a tenant who is a
veteran from a premises occupied by the tenant unless the premises is being used for
illegal conduct described in section 441.020.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.